New York, session 2025-2026, A8816.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 226-d to read as follows: 3 § 226-d. Lease paper reduction election. Notwithstanding any contrary 4 service or delivery requirements of this section or any other provision 5 of law, in entering or renewing any lease or rental agreement, tenants 6 and renters may be given the option to receive and, as needed, execute 7 such lease or rental agreement, any required renewal, and any rider or 8 notice served under, or required by, the lease or any statute, code, 9 ordinance, or other authority, solely by electronic means. Those elec- 10 tronic documents shall have the same force and effect as would paper 11 originals. This election shall not apply to any service of process or 12 predicate notices in judicial proceedings. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13295-02-6